Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5652.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2940a. (1) The owner or occupant of real property any portion of which is located in the area of a racing facility or racetrack shall not bring an action against the owner or operator of the racing facility or racetrack under any nuisance, taking, or other theory if the racing facility or racetrack was built before the real property owner or occupant either purchased the real property or built in the area of the racing facility or racetrack. (2) The immunity provided under this section applies regardless of any changes to the size, scope, configuration, technology, or type of racing conducted at the racing facility or racetrack, if the changes are lawful. (3) This section applies to a claim against a racing facility or racetrack located in this state before the date the real property owner or occupant bringing the claim acquired or improved the real property and applies to all claims filed on or after the effective date of this act, regardless of the date on which the cause of action is alleged to have arisen. (4) This section must not be construed to exempt a racing facility or racetrack from compliance with a state or federal environmental law or a health and safety regulation. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Area of a racing facility or racetrack" means within a 5-mile radius of the perimeter of the property or a contiguous group of properties where the racing facility or racetrack is located. (b) "Racing facility or racetrack" means a designated area or facility where competitive vehicle and motorsport races are conducted. Racing facility or racetrack includes the track, spectator areas, garages, and any associated grounds, buildings, or appurtenances used to operate the races.